Massachusetts, session 194th, H1523.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1.  Chapter 183A of the general laws, as appearing in the 2018 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following new sections:-- 
Section 23.  (a) There is hereby established an Office of the Condominium Ombudsman, 
to be located for administrative purposes within the Office of the Attorney General.  The 
functions of the office shall be funded by the Office of the Attorney General.  
(b) The Attorney General shall establish a statewide condominium ombudsman program 
for the purpose of receiving, investigating and resolving through administrative action 
complaints received by unit owners, boards of directors, board members, community 
associations, and other parties.  The Attorney General shall appoint an ombudsman to act as the 

of 3 10 director of the program who shall be a person qualified by training and experience to perform the 
duties of the office.  
Section 24.  In order to ensure the goals of the ombudsman program are met, the 
ombudsman shall:-- 
(a) Prepare and issue reports and recommendations to the Attorney General, the Inspector 
General, the Legislature, or any relevant agency, on any matter or subject within jurisdiction of 
the Attorney General.  When making recommendations to the Legislature, the ombudsman shall 
include drafts of legislation, if required; and 
(b) serve as a liaison between unit owners, boards of directors, board members, 
community association managers, and other affected parties.  The ombudsman shall develop 
policies and procedures to assist unit owners, boards of directors, board members, community 
association managers, and other affected parties to understand their rights and responsibilities as 
set forth in this chapter and the condominium documents governing their respective association.  
The ombudsman shall coordinate and assist in the promulgation of educational materials; and 
(c) to make recommendations to the Attorney General for changes in rules and 
procedures for the filing, investigation, and resolution of complaints filed by unit owners, 
associations, and managers; and 
(d) to provide resources to assist members of boards of directors and officers of 
associations to carry out their powers and duties consistent with this chapter, division rules, and 
the condominium documents governing the association; 

of 3 30  Section 25.  Upon the conveyance of a condominium for consideration of more than 100 
dollars, the seller shall pay the Attorney General a fee of fifty dollars, which shall be used 
exclusively to fund the Office of the Condominium Ombudsman and the Condominium 
Mediation Pilot Program. 
SECTION 2.  Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Office of 
the Condominium Ombudsman shall establish a Condominium Mediation Pilot Program.  The 
Ombudsman shall employ no fewer than two mediators to support the Ombudsman’s goal of 
resolving disputes between unit owners, boards of directors, board members, community 
association managers, and other affected parties, provided however, the mediators shall mediate 
disputes regarding delinquent fees. Further, the mediators shall not issue written decisions, nor 
will any decision or opinion be binding.  The ombudsman shall issue guidelines setting income 
and/or property value limits for participation in the program, which shall encourage participation 
by low and middle-income homeowners, as well as senior citizens, provided however, the 
income and/or property value to be used to determine eligibility shall be that of the unit owner, 
regardless of the initiating party.  The ombudsman shall also set a fee to be charged to the 
participant initiating of not less than two hundred dollars, provided however, the ombudsman 
shall grant fees waivers for indigent participants, senior citizens, and in his discretion.